Utah statutes.
63J-1-210.   Restrictions on agency expenditures of money -- Lobbyists.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a) (i)  "Agency" means:

(A)  a department, commission, board, council, agency, institution, officer, corporation, fund, division, office, committee, authority, laboratory, library, unit, bureau, panel, or other administrative unit of the state; or

(B)  a school, a school district, or a charter school.

(ii)  "Agency" includes the legislative branch, the judicial branch, the Board of Regents, the board of trustees of each higher education institution, or a higher education institution.

(b)  "Contract lobbyist" means a person who is not an employee of an agency who is hired as an independent contractor by the agency to communicate with legislators or the governor for the purpose of influencing the passage, defeat, amendment, or postponement of a legislative action or an executive action.

(c)  "Executive action" means action undertaken by the governor, including signing or vetoing legislation, and action undertaken by any official in the executive branch of state government.

(d)  "Legislative action" means action undertaken by the Utah Legislature or any part of it.

(2) An agency to which money is appropriated by the Legislature may not expend any money to pay a contract lobbyist.

(3)  This section does not affect the provisions of Title 36, Chapter 11, Lobbyist Disclosure and Regulation Act.



Amended by Chapter 323, 2011 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 342, 2011 General Session

